District of Columbia statutes.
1-1162.13

Formal investigation.

(a)

A formal investigation shall be initiated upon:

(1)

Receipt of a written complaint transmitted to the Ethics Board;

(2)

A finding by the Office of the Inspector General or District of Columbia Auditor of waste, fraud, abuse of government resources, or a violation of the Code of Conduct; or

(3)

A finding by a court of competent jurisdiction of liability in a civil proceeding, indictment, or information in a criminal proceeding with respect to acts or offenses that may constitute violations of the Code of Conduct or of this subchapter.

(b)

A written complaint shall include:

(1)

The full name and address of the complainant and the respondent;

(2)

A clear and concise statement of facts that are alleged to constitute a violation of the Code of Conduct or of this subchapter;

(3)

The complainant’s signature;

(4)

A verification of the complaint under oath; and

(5)

Supporting documentation, if any.

(c)

No complaint may be made under this subchapter later than 5 years after the discovery of the alleged violation.

(d)

An individual making a complaint shall be afforded all available protections from adverse employment action or retaliation in accordance with Chapter 6 of this title and subchapter XII of Chapter 2 of Title 2 [§ 2-223.01 et seq.].

(e)

Within 30 business days of the initiation of a formal investigation, the Director of Government Ethics shall cause evidence concerning the complaint to be presented to the Ethics Board, with the potential for a 15-business-day extension to be granted by the Ethics Board. If the Ethics Board decides that there is reasonable belief that a violation has occurred, the Ethics Board may authorize the issuance of subpoenas.

History

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 213, 59 DCR 1862
July 15, 2014, D.C. Law 20-122, § 2(e), 61 DCR 5688

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-1162.14.

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-122, in (e), substituted “30 business days” for “15 business days” and added “with the potential for a 15-business-day extension to be granted by the Ethics Board.”

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(e) of the Comprehensive Code of Conduct and BEGA Emergency Amendment Act of 2014, (D.C. Act 20-323, Apr. 28, 2014, 61 DCR 4681).